Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201267-455
Name.

(1) The name of a limited liability partnership shall:

(a) End with "registered limited liability partnership",
"limited liability partnership", "R.L.L.P.", "RLLP", "L.L.P.", or "LLP";

(b) Not be the same as or deceptively similar to, upon the
records in the office of the Secretary of State, a trade name registered in
this state pursuant to sections 87-208 to 87-219.01; and

(c) Not be the same as or deceptively similar to, upon the
records in the office of the Secretary of State, any other business entity
name registered or on file with the Secretary of State pursuant to Nebraska
law.

(2) A limited liability partnership may register under any
name which is deceptively similar to, upon the records in the office of the
Secretary of State, any other business entity name registered or on file with
the Secretary of State pursuant to Nebraska law with the written consent of
the other business entity or with the transfer of the name by the other business
entity. Written consent to the use of the name or written consent to the transfer
of the name shall be filed with the Secretary of State.

Laws 1997, LB 523, § 55;

Laws 2003, LB 464, § 9;

Laws 2011, LB462, § 6.